Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 6 State Police Retirement
24-6-507. Duration.

The duration of participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan for an active state police officer shall not exceed seven (7) years.

At the conclusion of a state police officer's participation in the plan, the state police officer shall:

Terminate employment with the Department of Arkansas State Police; and

Start receiving his or her accrued monthly retirement benefit from the State Police Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.

24-6-508. Death of participant.

If a participant in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan dies during the period of participation in the plan, a lump-sum payment equal to the plan account balance of the participant shall be paid to the participant's designated beneficiary.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1242, § 4.